Utah statutes.
51-9-412.   Law Enforcement Services Account -- Funding -- Uses.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Account" means the Law Enforcement Services Account.
(b)  "Commission" means the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice
created in Section 63M-7-201.
(c)  "Law enforcement agency" means a local law enforcement agency.
(2)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the "Law Enforcement Services Account."
(3) (a)  The Division of Finance shall allocate funds from the collected
surcharge in accordance with Subsection 51-9-401(1)(c) to the account, but not
to exceed the amount appropriated by the Legislature.
(b)  Money in the account shall be appropriated to the commission to
administer and distribute to law enforcement agencies providing services
directly to areas with halfway houses.
(4)  The commission shall allocate funds from the account to local law
enforcement agencies on a pro-rata basis determined by the number of beds in
each agency's jurisdiction for increased enforcement in areas with halfway
houses.
(5)  A law enforcement agency may use funds received under this section only
for the purposes stated in this section.
(6)  For each fiscal year, any law enforcement agency that receives funds from
the commission under this section shall prepare, and file with the commission
and the state auditor, a report in a form specified by the commission.  The
report shall include the following:
(a)  the agency's name;
(b)  the amount received;
(c)  how the funds were used, including the impact on crime reduction efforts
in areas with halfway houses; and
(d)  a statement signed by both the agency's or political subdivision's
executive officer or designee and by the agency's legal counsel that all funds
were used for law enforcement operations related to reducing criminal activity
in areas with halfway houses.
(7)  The commission shall report in writing to the legislative Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice Interim Committee annually regarding the funds allocated
under this section, including the amounts and uses.
